New Jersey, session 222, A3830.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall be known as the "Welcome Home Veterans Act." 2. a.  The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall provide information concerning federal and State benefits that are available to veterans upon the issuance of an initial license, renewal license, or probationary license to a veteran, which license includes a veteran designation pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2013, c.165 (C.39:3-10f6). b. The information required pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be provided in both a hardcopy version at each commission agency location and in a digital format available on the commissions Internet website and shall include, at a minimum: (1) a copy of the New Jersey Department of Military and Veterans Affairs Veterans Benefits Guide; (2) a copy of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs Federal Benefits for Veterans, Dependents, Survivors, and Caregivers booklet; (3) information on where veterans can find more information about available benefits; and (4) any other information the commission, in conjunction with the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, believes is necessary for veterans in this State. 3. a.  The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall provide information concerning federal and State benefits that are available to veterans upon the issuance of an identification card to a veteran, which identification card includes a veteran designation pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1980, c.47 (C.39:3-29.3). b. The information required pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be provided in both a hardcopy version available at each commission agency location and in a digital format available on the commissions Internet website and shall include, at a minimum: (1) a copy of the New Jersey Department of Military and Veterans Affairs Veterans Benefits Guide; (2) a copy of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs Federal Benefits for Veterans, Dependents, Survivors, and Caregivers booklet; (3) information on where veterans can find more information about available benefits; and (4) any other information the commission, in conjunction with the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, believes is necessary for veterans in this State. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.